Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-232
Board; adopt rules and regulations.

The board shall adopt and promulgate and enforce all rules, regulations, and orders necessary to carry out the Barber Act.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 5, p. 557;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 98.